Illinois, session 104th, HB4371.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public Utilities Act is amended by adding 5Section 16-107.5a as follows: 6    (220 ILCS 5/16-107.5a new)7    Sec. 16-107.5a. Portable solar generation devices. 8    (a) As used in this Section:9    "Electricity provider" has the meaning given to that term 10in Section 16-107.5.11    "Eligible customer" has the meaning given to that term in 12Section 16-107.5. 13    "Net electricity metering" has the meaning given to that 14term in Section 16-107.5.15    "Portable solar generation device" means a moveable 16photovoltaic generation device that:17        (1) has a maximum power output of 1,200 watts or less;18        (2) is designed to be connected to a building's 19    electrical system through a standard 120-volt alternating 20    current outlet;21        (3) is intended primarily to offset part of an 22    eligible customer's electricity consumption;23        (4) meets the standards of the current edition of the   HB4371- 2 -LRB104 17504 AAS 30931 b1    National Electrical Code; and2        (5) is certified by Underwriters Laboratories or an 3    equivalent nationally recognized testing laboratory.4    (b) A portable solar generation device shall be exempt 5from (i) net electricity metering program and interconnection 6requirements under Section 16-107.5 and (ii) any rules adopted 7pursuant to Section 16-107.5.8    (c) A portable solar generation device shall include a 9device or feature that prevents the portable solar generation 10device from energizing a building's electrical system during a 11power outage.12    (d) An electricity provider shall not require an eligible 13customer who uses, or intends to install and use, a portable 14solar generation device to do any of the following:15        (1) obtain the electricity provider's approval before 16    installing or using the portable solar generation device;17        (2) pay a fee or charge related to the installation or 18    use of the portable solar generation device; or19        (3) install additional controls or equipment beyond 20    what is integrated into the portable solar generation 21    device.22    (e) An electricity provider shall not be liable for any 23damage or injury caused by an eligible customer's portable 24solar generation device.